Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Article 3. Management of the Common Interest Community
§ 3-116.
Lien for sums due association; enforcement.

The association has a statutory lien on a unit for any assessment attributable to that unit or fines imposed against its unit owner. Unless the declaration otherwise provides, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, other fees, charges, late charges, fines, and interest charged pursuant to subdivisions 3-102(a)(10), (11), and (12) of this title, and any other sums due to the association under the declaration, this title, or as a result of an administrative, arbitration, mediation, or judicial decision, are enforceable in the same manner as unpaid assessments under this section. If an assessment is payable in installments, the full amount of the assessment is a lien from the time the first installment becomes due.

A lien under this section is prior to all other liens and encumbrances on a unit except:

liens and encumbrances recorded before the recordation of the declaration; and

except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a first mortgage or deed of trust on the unit recorded before the date on which the assessment to be enforced became delinquent; and

liens for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the unit.

A lien under this section is also prior to all security interests described in subdivision (b)(2) of this section to the extent of the common expense assessments based on the periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to subsection 3-115(a) of this title that would have become due in the absence of acceleration during the six months immediately preceding institution of an action to enforce the lien. Subsections (b) and (c) of this section do not affect the priority of mechanics’ or materialmen’s liens, or the priority of liens for other assessments made by the association. A lien under this section is not subject to the provisions of 27 V.S.A. chapter 3.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same property, those liens have equal priority.

Recording the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the lien. No further recording of any claim or lien for assessment under this section is required.

A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within three years after the full amount of the assessment becomes due.

This section does not prohibit an action against unit owners to recover sums for which subsection (a) of this section creates a lien or an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

A judgment or decree in any action brought under this section shall include an award of costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

The association, upon request made in a record, shall furnish to a unit owner a statement of the amount of unpaid assessments against that unit. If the unit owner’s interest is real estate, the statement shall be recordable. The statement shall be provided within 10 business days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the executive board, and every unit owner.

The association’s lien may be foreclosed pursuant to 12 V.S.A. chapter 172 and subsection (o) of this section. The association shall give the notice required by statute, or if there is no such requirement, reasonable notice of its action to all lienholders of the unit whose interest would be affected.

A unit owner is not exempt from liability for payment of common expenses by a waiver of the use or enjoyment of any of the common elements or by abandonment of the unit.

In an action by an association to collect assessments or to foreclose a lien on a unit under this section, the court may appoint a receiver to collect all sums alleged to be due and owing to a unit owner before commencement or during pendency of the action. The court may order the receiver to pay any sums held by the receiver to the association during pendency of the action to the extent of the association’s common expense assessments based on a periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to section 3-115 of this title.

An association may not commence an action to foreclose a lien on a unit under this section unless:

the unit owner, at the time the action is commenced, owes a sum equal to at least three months of common expense assessments based on the periodic budget last adopted by the association pursuant to subsection 3-115(a) of this title and the unit owner has failed to accept or comply with a payment plan offered by the association; and

the executive board votes to commence a foreclosure action specifically against that unit.

Unless the parties otherwise agree, the association shall apply any sums paid by unit owners that are delinquent in paying assessments in the following order:

unpaid assessments;

late charges;

reasonable attorney’s fees and costs and other reasonable collection charges; and

all other unpaid fees, charges, fines, penalties, interest, and late charges.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, unless sums due the association include an unpaid assessment, a foreclosure action may not be commenced against the unit unless the association has a judgment against the unit owner for the sums due the association and has perfected a judgment lien against the unit.

Every aspect of a foreclosure, sale, or other disposition under this section, including the method, advertising, time, date, place, and terms, must be commercially reasonable.

Unless other procedures are provided in the declaration, bylaws, or rules, an association of time-share unit owners may not deny an owner of a time-share access to the owner’s time-share for failure to pay an assessment unless:

the time-share owner is delinquent in payment of that owner’s common expense assessments based on the periodic budget last adopted by the association pursuant to subsection 3-115(a) of this title; and

the association provides written notice of the delinquency to the time-share owner no less than 30 days after the date the assessment was due, but in no case later than 30 days before the date the time-share owner is entitled to occupy that owner’s time-share.

The following provisions apply to the notice required in subdivision (2) of this subsection:

The notice shall clearly state the total amount of any delinquency that then exists, including any accrued interest and late charges permitted to be imposed under the terms of the declaration or bylaws and including a per diem amount, if any, to account for further accrual of interest and late charges between the stated effective date of the notice and the first date of use.

The notice shall clearly state that the time-share owner will not be permitted to use his or her time-share interest, that the time-share owner will not be permitted to make a reservation in the time-share property’s reservation system, or that any confirmed reservation may be canceled, as applicable, until the total amount of such delinquency is satisfied in full or until the time-share owner produces satisfactory evidence that the delinquency does not exist.

The notice shall be mailed to the time-share owner at his or her last known address as recorded in the books and records of the time-share property, and the notice shall be effective to bar the use of the time-share owner and those claiming use rights under the time-share owner, including his or her guests, lessees, and the third parties receiving use rights in the time-share in question through a nonaffiliated exchange program, until such time as the unit owner is no longer delinquent.

If the association elects to deny use of the owner’s time-share to any third party receiving use rights through an affiliated exchange program, the association shall at the same time provide similar written notice of the owner’s delinquency as required in subdivision (2) of this subsection to any affiliated exchange program. Receipt of the written notice by the affiliated exchange program is effective to bar the use of all third parties claiming through the affiliated exchange program.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2001, No. 46

, § 13;

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. Jan. 1, 2012;

2013, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 3-117.
Other liens.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a judgment for money against the association pursuant to

12 V.S.A. § 4531a

, if recorded, is not a lien on the common elements, but is a lien in favor of the judgment lienholder against all of the other real estate of the association and all of the units in the common interest community at the time the judgment was entered. No other property of a unit owner is subject to the claims of creditors of the association.

If the association has granted a security interest in the common elements to a creditor of the association pursuant to section 3-108 of this title, the holder of that security interest shall exercise its right against the common elements before its judgment lien on any unit may be enforced.

Whether perfected before or after the creation of the common interest community, if a lien, other than a deed of trust or mortgage, becomes effective against two or more units, the unit owner of an affected unit may pay to the lienholder the amount of the lien attributable to that unit, and the lienholder, upon receipt of payment, shall promptly deliver a release of the lien covering that unit. The amount of payment shall be proportional to the ratio of that unit owner’s common expense liability to the common expense liabilities of all unit owners whose units are subject to the lien. After payment, the association shall not have a lien or assessment against that unit owner’s unit for any portion of the common expenses incurred in connection with that lien.

A judgment against the association shall be indexed in the name of the common interest community and the association and after it is indexed is notice of the lien against the units.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-118.
Association records.

An association shall retain the following:

detailed records of receipts and expenditures affecting the operation and administration of the association and other appropriate accounting records;

minutes of all meetings of its unit owners and executive board other than executive sessions, a record of all actions taken by the unit owners or executive board without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee in place of the executive board on behalf of the association;

the names of unit owners in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names of all owners and the addresses at which the association communicates with them, in alphabetical order showing the number of votes each owner is entitled to cast;

its original or restated organizational documents, if required by law other than this title, bylaws and all amendments to them, and all rules currently in effect;

all financial statements and tax returns of the association for the past three years;

a list of the names and addresses of its current executive board members and officers;

its most recent annual report delivered to the secretary of state;

financial and other records sufficiently detailed to enable the association to comply with section 4-109 of this title;

copies of current contracts to which it is a party;

records of executive board or committee actions to approve or deny any requests for design or architectural approval from unit owners; and

ballots, proxies, and other records related to voting by unit owners for one year after the election, action, or vote to which they relate.

Subject to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, all records retained by an association must be available for examination and copying by a unit owner or the owner’s authorized agent:

during reasonable business hours or at a mutually convenient time and location; and

upon five days’ notice in a record reasonably identifying the specific records of the association requested.

Records retained by an association may be withheld from inspection and copying to the extent that they concern:

personnel, salary, and medical records relating to specific individuals;

contracts, leases, and other commercial transactions to purchase or provide goods or services currently being negotiated;

existing or potential litigation or mediation, arbitration, or administrative proceedings;

existing or potential matters involving federal, state, or local administrative or other formal proceedings before a governmental tribunal for enforcement of the declaration, bylaws, or rules;

communications with the association’s attorney which are otherwise protected by the attorney-client privilege or the attorney work-product doctrine;

information the disclosure of which would violate law other than this title;

records of an executive session of the executive board; or

individual unit files other than those of the requesting owner.

An association may charge a reasonable fee for providing copies of any records under this section and for supervising the unit owner’s inspection.

A right to copy records under this section includes the right to receive copies by photocopying or other means, including copies through an electronic transmission if available upon request by the unit owner.

An association is not obligated to compile or synthesize information.

Information provided pursuant to this section may not be used for commercial purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-119.
Association as trustee.

A third person dealing with the association in the association’s capacity as a trustee may assume without inquiry that the association has trust powers and will properly exercise them. A third person, without actual knowledge that the association is exceeding or improperly exercising its powers, is fully protected in dealing with the association as if the association possessed and properly exercised the powers it purports to exercise. A third person is not bound to assure the proper application of trust assets paid or delivered to the association in its capacity as trustee.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3-120.
Rules.

Before adopting, amending, or repealing any rule, the executive board shall give all unit owners notice of:

its intention to adopt, amend, or repeal a rule and provide the text of the rule or the proposed change; and

a date on which the executive board will act on the proposed rule or amendment after considering comments from unit owners.

Following adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule, the association shall notify the unit owners of its action and provide a copy of any new or revised rule.

An association may adopt rules to establish and enforce construction and design criteria and aesthetic standards if the declaration so provides. If the declaration so provides, the association shall adopt procedures for enforcement of those standards and for approval of construction applications, including a reasonable time within which the association must act after an application is submitted and the consequences of its failure to act.

A rule regulating display of the flag of the United States must be consistent with federal law. In addition, the association may not prohibit display on a unit or on a limited common element adjoining a unit of the flag of this state, or signs regarding candidates for public or association office or ballot questions, but the association may adopt rules governing the time, place, size, number, and manner of those displays.

Unit owners may peacefully assemble on the common elements to consider matters related to the common interest community, but the association may adopt rules governing the time, place, and manner of those assemblies.

An association may adopt rules that affect the use of or behavior in units that may be used for residential purposes, only to:

implement a provision of the declaration;

regulate any behavior in or occupancy of a unit which violates the declaration or adversely affects the use and enjoyment of other units or the common elements by other unit owners; or

restrict the leasing of residential units to the extent those rules are reasonably designed to meet underwriting requirements of institutional lenders that regularly make loans secured by first mortgages on units in common interest communities or regularly purchase those mortgages.

An association’s internal business operating procedures need not be adopted as rules.

Every rule must be reasonable.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 38, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-121.
Notice to unit owners.

An association shall deliver any notice required to be given by the association under this title to any mailing or electronic mail address a unit owner designates. Otherwise, the association may deliver notices by:

hand delivery to each unit owner;

hand delivery, United States mail postage paid, or commercially reasonable delivery service to the mailing address of each unit;

electronic means, if the unit owner has given the association an electronic address; or

any other method reasonably calculated to provide notice to the unit owner.

The ineffectiveness of a good faith effort to deliver notice by an authorized means does not invalidate action taken at or without a meeting.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 39, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-122.
Removal of officers and directors.

Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, unit owners present in person, by proxy, or by absentee ballot at any meeting of the unit owners at which a quorum is present may remove any member of the executive board and any officer elected by the unit owners, with or without cause, if the number of votes cast in favor of removal exceeds the number of votes cast in opposition to removal, but:

a member appointed by the declarant may not be removed by a unit owner vote during the period of declarant control;

a member appointed under subsection 3-103(g) of this title may be removed only by the person that appointed that member; and

the unit owners may not consider whether to remove a member of the executive board or an officer elected by the unit owners at a meeting of the unit owners unless that subject was listed in the notice of the meeting.

At any meeting at which a vote to remove a member of the executive board or an officer is to be taken, the member or officer being considered for removal must have a reasonable opportunity to speak before the vote.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 40, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-123.
Adoption of budgets; special assessments.

The executive board, at least annually, shall adopt a proposed budget for the common interest community for consideration by the unit owners. Not later than 30 days after adoption of a proposed budget, the executive board shall provide to all the unit owners a summary of the budget, including any reserves, and a statement of the basis on which any reserves are calculated and funded. Simultaneously, the board shall set a date not less than 10 days or more than 60 days after providing the summary for a meeting of the unit owners to consider ratification of the budget. Unless at that meeting a majority of all unit owners or any larger number specified in the declaration reject the budget, the budget is ratified, whether or not a quorum is present. If a proposed budget is rejected, the budget last ratified by the unit owners continues until unit owners ratify a subsequent budget.

The executive board, at any time, may propose a special assessment. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, the assessment is effective only if the executive board follows the procedures for ratification of a budget described in subsection (a) and the unit owners do not reject the proposed assessment.

If the executive board determines by a two-thirds vote that a special assessment is necessary to respond to an emergency:

the special assessment becomes effective immediately in accordance with the terms of the vote;

notice of the emergency assessment must be provided promptly to all unit owners; and

the executive board may spend the funds paid on account of the emergency assessment only for the purposes described in the vote.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 3-124.
Litigation involving declarant.

The following requirements apply to an association’s authority under subdivision 3-102 (a)(4) of this title to institute and maintain a proceeding alleging a construction defect with respect to the common interest community, whether by litigation, mediation, arbitration, or administratively, against a declarant or an employee, independent contractor, or other person directly or indirectly providing labor or materials to a declarant:

Subject to subsection (e) of this section, before the association institutes a proceeding described in this section, it shall provide notice in a record of its claims to the declarant and those persons that the association seeks to hold liable for the claimed defects. The text of the notice may be in any form reasonably calculated to give notice of the general nature of the association’s claims, including a list of the claimed defects. The notice may be delivered by any method of service and may be addressed to any person if the method of service used:

provides actual notice to the person named in the claim; or

would be sufficient to give notice to the person in connection with commencement of an action by the association against the person.

Subject to subsection (e) of this section, the association may not institute a proceeding against a person until 45 days after the association sends notice of its claim to that person.

During the period described in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the declarant and any other person to which the association gave notice may present to the association a plan to repair or otherwise remedy the construction defects described in the notice. If the association does not receive a timely remediation plan from a person to which it gave notice, or if the association does not accept the terms of any plan submitted, the association may institute a proceeding against the person.

If the association receives one or more timely remediation plans, the executive board shall consider promptly those plans and notify the persons to which it directed notice whether the plan is acceptable as presented, acceptable with stated conditions, or not accepted.

If the association accepts a remediation plan from a person the association seeks to hold liable for the claimed defect, or if a person agrees to stated conditions to an otherwise acceptable plan, the parties shall agree on a period for implementation of the plan. The association may not institute a proceeding against the person during the time the plan is being diligently implemented.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4-116(d) of this title for warranty claims, any statute of limitation affecting the association’s right of action against a declarant or other person is tolled during the period described in subdivision (2) of this section and during any extension of that time because a person to which notice was directed has commenced and is diligently pursuing the remediation plan.

After the time described in subdivision (a)(2) of this section expires, whether or not the association agrees to any remediation plan, a proceeding may be instituted by:

the association against a person to which notice was directed which fails to submit a timely remediation plan, the plan of which is not acceptable, or which fails to pursue diligent implementation of that plan; or

a unit owner with respect to the owner’s unit and any limited common elements assigned to that unit, regardless of any action of the association.

This section does not preclude the association from making repairs necessary to mitigate damages or to correct any defect that poses a significant and immediate health or safety risk.

Subject to the other provisions of this section, the determination of whether and when the association may institute a proceeding described in this section may be made by the executive board. The declaration may not require a vote by any number or percent of unit owners as a condition to institution of a proceeding.

This section does not prevent an association from seeking equitable relief at any time without complying with subdivision (a)(1) or (2) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 42, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.